South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S257.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 13, Title 7 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 7-13-65. If at any polling place the opening of polls is delayed by more than fifteen minutes beyond the time specified in Section 7-13-25 for early voting or Section 70-13-60 for election day voting, or if voting at a polling place is interrupted for more than fifteen minutes after opening, then the county board of voter registration and elections must extend the closing time by a number of minutes equal to the duration of the delay or interruption. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----